District of Columbia statutes.
29A-1105

Repealed

Semiannual publication of certain foreign corporations required.

Repealed.

July 29, 1892, 27 Stat. 325, ch. 321, §§ 1, 2
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-81, § 2, 29 DCR 156
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(t), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-105.
1981 Ed., § 29-105.
2001 Ed., § 29-1105.